Hawaii, session 2026, HB157.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: PART I SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the roads within the Villages of Kapolei, which were constructed by the Hawaii housing finance and development corporation during the 1990s, were supposed to be transferred to the city and county of Honolulu, but the transfer process has stalled for decades due to the city and county of Honolulu establishing certain requirements for accepting the dedication. The purpose of this part is to require the Hawaii housing finance and development corporation and the city and county of Honolulu to complete the transfer of the Villages of Kapolei roads. SECTION 2.  (a) The Hawaii housing finance and development corporation and the city and county of Honolulu shall enter into an agreement for the transfer of the roads within the Villages of Kapolei to the city and county of Honolulu. (b)  The roads shall be transferred no later than January 1, 2026. PART II SECTION 3.  The purpose of this part is to authorize county police officers to be able to enforce the statewide traffic code on all public streets, roadways, and highways within the State. SECTION 4.  Chapter 291C, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§291C-     County police officer authority.   Each police officer of a county shall have the authority to enforce this chapter for any violation of this chapter that occurs on any federal, state, and county street, roadway, or highway." SECTION 5.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 6.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________